Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.180.060

Guidelines and rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Promulgate and issue program development guidelines to assist school districts in preparing their programs;

(2) Promulgate rules for implementation of RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The rules shall be designed to maximize the role of school districts in selecting programs appropriate to meet the needs of eligible students. The rules shall identify the process and criteria to be used to determine when a student is no longer eligible for transitional bilingual instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080.

[ 1990 c 33 s 165; 1984 c 124 s 5; 1979 c 95 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.58.808.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 95: See note following RCW 28A.180.010.